Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.305

Promotional hosting expenditures—Rules.

Agricultural commodity boards shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by commodity board employees, agents, or board members under RCW 15.04.200.

[ 2002 c 313 s 31.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.